test/src/morphology/N-F-Ж_8В-любовь_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - любовь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: любо́вь
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: любо́вь
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: любо́вью
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: любви́
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: любве́й
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: любвя́х
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: любвя́м
      любовь+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: любвя́ми
      
